California, session 20252026, AB1362.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) It is well documented that foreign labor recruiters charge illegal and exorbitant recruitment fees and misrepresent the terms and conditions of work and visas to foreign workers seeking to work in California on temporary visas legally. These fraudulent activities lead to human trafficking and labor exploitation, harming both workers and ethical businesses.(b) In 2014, the Legislature passed Senate Bill 477, authored by Senator Darrell Steinberg, to protect the 130,000 foreign workers on temporary work visas who came to California annually. However, due to a drafting error, only 3 percent of California’s temporary foreign workers currently receive the comprehensive protection intended by Senate Bill 477. Since 2014, the number of foreign workers coming legally to California on temporary work visas has increased by almost 169 percent, resulting in 345,000 temporary workers entering California annually who remain unprotected.(c) The goals of Senate Bill 477, as enacted, were to expand the regulation of foreign labor recruiters by: (1) Creating a universal standard prohibiting recruitment fees for all workers coming to California.(2) Requiring the registration of foreign labor recruiters (FLRs) for recruitment activities conducted outside of the United States. (3) Mandating California employers to use registered FLRs. (4) Ensuring comprehensive disclosure of working terms and conditions to foreign workers through written contracts during the recruitment process. (5) Imposing bonds and penalties for noncompliance with the law’s requirements.(d) Although the Legislature intended to protect all visa holders through Senate Bill 477, implementation of the law has left foreign workers unprotected, including visa holders on A-3, B-1, H-1B, H-1C, H-2A, H-2B, L-1, O-1, P-3, and TN temporary work visas. Senate Bill 477 intended to protect these workers from fraudulent “foreign labor contracting activity,” defined as recruiting or soliciting for compensation a foreign worker residing outside of the United States. Senate Bill 477 focused on activities at the time of recruitment and does not apply to employers who directly recruit their own foreign workers or workers already inside the United States.(e) From 2014 to 2024, the National Human Trafficking Hotline has documented that the H-2A visa, used to bring foreign workers for seasonal agriculture work, has been involved in the most reports for human trafficking cases among temporary visa holders. H-2A visa holders constitute approximately 14 percent of the foreign workers who come annually to California on temporary work visas. Current law, including California’s farm labor contractor requirements, does not protect these workers and other visa holders from illegal activities at the time of recruitment in their home country, which was the intent of Senate Bill 477.SEC. 2. Section 9998 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 9998 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:9998. This chapter shall apply only to the following:(a) Nonagricultural workers under the federal H-2B visa program established pursuant to Section 101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(b) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(b)).(b) On and after July 1, 2027, agricultural workers under the federal H-2A visa program established pursuant to Section 101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(a) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(a)).SEC. 4. Section 9998.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:9998.1. The following definitions are applicable to this chapter:(a) “Person” includes any natural person, company, firm, partnership or joint venture, association, corporation, limited liability company, or sole proprietorship.(b)  “Foreign labor contracting activity” means recruiting or soliciting for compensation a foreign worker who resides outside of the United States in furtherance of that worker’s employment in California, including when that activity occurs wholly outside the United States. “Foreign labor contracting activity” does not include the services of an employer, or employee of an employer, if those services are provided directly to foreign workers solely to find workers for the employer’s own use.(c) “Foreign worker” means any person seeking employment who is not a United States citizen or permanent resident but who is authorized by the federal government to work in the United States, including a person who engages in temporary nonagricultural labor pursuant to Section 101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(b) of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(b)). “Foreign worker” shall also include any worker described in Section 9998.(d) “Foreign labor contractor” means any person who performs foreign labor contracting activity, including any person who performs foreign labor contracting activity wholly outside the United States, except that the term does not include any entity of federal, state, or local government. “Foreign labor contractor” does not include a person licensed by the Labor Commissioner as a talent agency under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1700) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, or a person who obtained and maintains full written designation from the United States Department of State under Part 62 of Title 22 of the Code of Federal Regulations.SEC. 5. Section 9998.1.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:9998.1.5. (a) (1) On and after July 1, 2016, a person acting as a foreign labor contractor shall register with the Labor Commissioner in accordance with the terms and procedures for registration established by the commissioner by January 1, 2016.(2) On and after July 1, 2027, a person who is licensed or acting as a farm labor contractor pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1682) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Labor Code and who performs foreign labor contracting activities shall register with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to the terms and procedures for registration described in paragraph (1).(3) In registering a person already licensed as a farm labor contractor pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1682) of Part 6 of Division 2 of the Labor Code as a foreign labor contractor pursuant to paragraph (2), the Labor Commissioner has discretion, to the extent feasible for the efficient administration of the program, to eliminate duplicative application information requirements for information previously obtained from the farm labor contractor’s license application if both of the following conditions are met:(A) The applicant provides their farm labor contractor license number.(B) The applicant attests that there are no changes to the information previously provided to the Labor Commissioner.(4) The commissioner shall post on its internet website the names and contact information for all registered foreign labor contractors and a list of the names and contact information for any foreign labor contractors denied renewal or registration.(b) The Labor Commissioner may not register a person to act as a foreign labor contractor, and may not renew a registration, until all of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The person has executed a written application in a form prescribed by the commissioner, subscribed and sworn to by the person, and containing all of the following:(A) A statement by the person of all facts required by the commissioner concerning the applicant’s character, competency, responsibility, and the manner and means by which the person proposes to conduct operations as a foreign labor contractor if registered.(B) The names and addresses of all persons, except bona fide employees on stated salaries, financially interested, either as partners, associates, or profit sharers, in the proposed operation as a foreign labor contractor, together with the amount of their respective interests.(C) A declaration consenting to the designation by a court or the commissioner as an agent available to accept service of summons in any action against the registrant, if the registrant has left the jurisdiction in which the action is commenced or otherwise has become unavailable to accept service.(D) On and after July 1, 2027, a listing of each federal visa program under which the person will be performing foreign labor contractor activities.(2) The commissioner, after investigation, is satisfied as to the character, competency, and responsibility of the person.(3) (A) The person has deposited with the commissioner a surety bond in an amount based on the size of the person’s annual gross receipts from operations as a foreign labor contractor, as follows:(i) For gross receipts up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), a fifty-thousand-dollar ($50,000) bond.(ii) For gross receipts of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to two million dollars ($2,000,000), a one-hundred-thousand-dollar ($100,000) bond.(iii) For gross receipts greater than two million dollars ($2,000,000), a one-hundred-fifty-thousand-dollar ($150,000) bond.(B) If the foreign labor contractor has been the subject of a final judgment in a year in an amount equal to that of the bond required, that contractor shall be required to deposit an additional bond within 60 days. The bond shall be payable to the people of the State of California and shall be conditioned on the foreign labor contractor complying with all the terms and provisions of this chapter and paying all damages occasioned to any person by failure to do so, or by any violation of this chapter, or false statements or misrepresentations made in the registration process. The bond shall also be payable for interest on wages and for any damages arising from violation of applicable orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and for any other monetary relief awarded to a foreign worker as a result of a violation of law by the foreign labor contractor.(4) The person has paid to the commissioner a registration fee and a filing fee in a total amount the commissioner determines is sufficient to support the ongoing costs of the program.(c) The commissioner may not register a person as a foreign labor contractor, if the person was found by a court, the Secretary of Labor, or the commissioner to have violated any of the following provisions:(1) The federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000 (Division A, Public Law 106-386), as amended.(2) Sections 1682 to 1699, inclusive, of the Labor Code.(3) Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.(4) An applicable guest worker program.SEC. 6. Section 9998.8 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:9998.8. (a) A person who violates this chapter or who causes or induces another to violate this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both. A person shall not be liable under this subdivision for any act or omission by a foreign labor contractor engaged by the person if the foreign labor contractor was registered with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 9998.1.5 no later than the first day of engagement.(b) A person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation, in addition to any other civil remedies available to the Labor Commissioner or an aggrieved person.(c) The commissioner or a person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may do all of the following:(1) Bring an action for injunctive relief against a person who violates this chapter and, upon prevailing, recover costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.(2) Bring an action for damages, against a person who violates this chapter to recover the greater of all of the aggrieved person’s actual damages or five hundred dollars ($500) per employee per violation for an initial violation, and one thousand dollars ($1,000) per employee for each subsequent violation, and, upon prevailing in an action brought pursuant to this section, recover costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.(3) Enforce the liability on the bonds required under Section 9998.1.5.(d) The Labor Commissioner may enforce the requirements of this chapter through the procedures set forth in Sections 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, and 1197.1 of the Labor Code, including the issuance of a citation or filing of a civil action against a person who violates the requirements of this chapter.(e) A person shall not be jointly and severally liable for any act or omission by a foreign labor contractor engaged by the person if the foreign labor contractor was registered with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 9998.1.5 no later than the first day of engagement.(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt or alter any other rights or remedies, including any causes of action, available under any other federal or state law.SEC. 7. Section 9998.10 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:9998.10. The Labor Commissioner and the deputies and representatives authorized by the commissioner in writing may take assignments of actions on the bonds required under Section 9998.1.5 by aggrieved persons and may prosecute the actions on behalf of persons who, in the judgment of the commissioner, are financially unable to employ counsel, in the same manner that claims are prosecuted under Section 98.3 of the Labor Code.SEC. 8. Section 9998.12 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:9998.12. (a) The Department of Industrial Relations shall submit to the Legislature, by January 1, 2028, and in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a study on how to extend foreign labor contractor registration requirements to those foreign labor contractors recruiting or soliciting workers authorized to work in the United States under visa programs not described in either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 9998. This study shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:(1) An overview of the federal visa programs not covered by this chapter’s foreign labor contractor registration program.(2) An analysis of the demographics of foreign workers in California authorized to work through the federal visa programs described in paragraph (1).(3) A discussion of any additional steps the Labor Commissioner would need to take to ensure all foreign labor contractors are required to register pursuant to this chapter.(4) A discussion of operational needs, including access to data, fee increases to cover costs, and enforcement options already available pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 9998.8.(5) Recommendations of options to expand this chapter’s foreign labor contractor registration program that considers the following:(A) Risks to workers authorized to work in the United States through the visa programs described in paragraph (1).(B) Costs and staffing needs to expand the registration process required for foreign labor contractors under this chapter.(C) Enforcement costs and options, including those authorized by subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 9998.8.(D) The operational constraints described in paragraph (4).(b) The Department of Industrial Relations may contract with a third party to conduct the study described in subdivision (a).(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2029.SEC. 9. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.